DI-312

DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTER POWER

SUPPLY SYSTEM
PRE-CHECK
ﬁa 1. DIAGNOSIS SYSTEM
=P (@ Check the warning lights and buzzer.
7 : i (1) Release parking brake lever.
l (2) When the ignition switch is turned ON, check that
the ABS warning lights go on for 3 seconds.
BRAKE (8) Check the BRAKE warning light lights up when the
ignition switch is turned ON and the light goes off
Fo4445 when the engine starts.
(4) When 120 seconds have elapsed after the ignition
switch was turned ON, depressing and releasing
the brake pedal continuously with full stroke 15 - 20
times within 10 secs., warning light lights up and
buzzer sounds.
HINT:
If the indicator check result is not normal, proceed to trouble-
shooting for the ABS warning light circuit (See page DI-395).
(b) In case of not using hand-held tester :
1 Short Pin Check the DTC.
(1) Disconnect the short pin from check connector.
Check Connector
F00006
(2 Using SST, connect terminals Tc and E_ of check
Check Connector 1
connector.
" =D SST  09843-18020
= T (83)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
O D (4) Read the DTC from the ABS warning light on the
combination meter.
AN d », [:l:] HINT:

Tc

F02201
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If no code appears, inspect the diagnostic circuit or ABS warn-
ing light circuit (See page DI-404 or DI-395).
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ON A

Normal Code

2 secs. 0.25 secs.
0.25 secs.
_‘ - ==

OFF

ON

OFF

Code 11 and 21

0.5 secs. 0.5 secs.

T \». / | m/ |

Code 11 Code 21

R01346

Hand-held
Tester

A05868

F05576
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. As an example, the blinking patterns for normal code and
codes 11 and 21 are shown on the left.
(6) Codes are explained in the code table on page
DI-319.
(6) After completing the check, disconnect terminals Tc
andE . andturnoffthe display.
If 2 or more malfunctions are indicated at the same time the low-
estnumbered DTCwillbedisplayed  1st.

(c)Incaseofusinghand -heldtester:

Check the DTC.

(1)Hookupthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(2) Readthe DTC by following the prompts onthe tes-

ter screen.

HINT:
Pleaserefertothehand -heldtesteroperator’'s manualforfur-
ther details.

(d) Incaseofnotusinghand  -heldtester:
Clear the DTC.
(1) Using SST, connectterminals Tcand E ofcheck
connector and remove the short pin from check
connector.

SST 09843 -18020
(2)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

(8) Clear the DTC stored in ECU by depressing the
brake pedal 8 or more times within 5 seconds.

(4) Check that the warning light shows the normal
code.
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Check Connector
F00006

Hand-held
Tester

=

=

LHD/ @

DLC3
RHD:
Q=

A05868

Hand-held Tester

Break-out-box

N09348
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(5) Remove the SST from the terminals of check con-
nector.
SST 09843 -18020
(6) Connect the short pin to check connector.
HINT:
Disconnecting the battery cable during repairs will not erase the
DTC in the ECU.

(e) Incaseofusinghand -heldtester:

Clear the DTC.

(1)Hookupthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(2) Turntheignition switch ON.

(3) Operatethehand -heldtesterto erasethe codes.

(Seehand -heldtester operator’'s manual.)

(f) (Reference):

Using break —out-boxandhand -heldtester, measurethe

ECU terminal values.

(1) Turntheignition switch OFF.

(2) Hookupthebreak -out-boxandhand -heldtester
to the vehicle.

(83)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

(4) Read the ECU input/output values by following the
prompts on the tester screen.

. hand-heldtester has a”Snapshot”function. This records
the measured values and is effective in the diagnosis of
intermittent problems.

. Pleaserefertothehand -heldtester/break —out-boxop-
erator’s manual for further details.
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Check Connector

=0
\OTiﬁ

Ts

F02201

0.13 secs. 0.13 secs.

ON 7

OFF i

BR3904
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2. SENSOR SIGNAL CHECK (TEST MODE)
HINT:
If the ignition switch is turned from ON to ACC or LOCK during
test mode, DTC will be erased.
(@) In case of not using hand-held tester:
Check the sensor signal.
(1) Turn the ignition switch OFF.
(2 Using SST, connect terminals Ts and E1 of check
connector.
SST 09843-18020
(3) Start the engine.

(4) Check that the ABS warning light blinks.
HINT:
If the ABS warning light does not blink, inspect the ABS warning
light circuit and Ts circuit (See page DI-395, DI-406).
(5) Keep the vehicle in the stationary condition on the
flat place for 6 sec. or more.
(6) Shift the transfer lever in L4 position and turn the
Center diff. lock switch ON.
(7) Drive vehicle straightforward.
When driving the vehicle with the speed faster than
45 km/h (28 mph) for several seconds, check that
the ABS warning light comes off.
HINT:
There is a case that the sensor check is not completed if the ve-
hicle has its rear wheels spun or its steering wheel steered dur-
ing this check.
(8) Stop the vehicle.
(9) Check ABS warning light goes off when the rear diff.
lock indicator light lights up or flashes.
HINT:
While the rear diff. is being locked, ECU records DTC 48.
(10) Using SST, connectterminals Tcand E ’ ofcheck
connector.
SST 09843 -18020
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(11) Read the number of blinks of the ABS warning light.

HINT:

S
S

See the list of DTC on the next page.

If every sensor is normal, a normal code is output (A cycle

of 0.25 secs. ON and 0.25 secs. OFF is repeated).

If 2 or more malfunctions are indicated at the same time,

the lowest numbered code will be displayed 1st.

(12) After doing the check, disconnect terminals Ts and
E,, Tc and E; of check connector, and turn the igni-
tion switch OFF.

A05868

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)

Malfunction Code (Example Code 72, 76)
7 2 7 6
’ ~ — r & ™ 4 A A
- ”.MUUI_H_IUM
OFF 15 e
.5 secs. |2.5 secs. 4 secs.
0.5 secs. 0.5 secs. —=
0.5secs. 0.5 secs. Repeat
BR3893
(b) In case of using hand-held tester :

Check the sensor signal.

(1) Hook up the hand-held tester to the DLC3.

(2) Do step (3) to (9) on the previous and this page.

(3) Readthe DTC by following the prompts on the tes-
ter screen.

HINT:
Please refer to the hand—held tester operator’'s manual for fur-

ther details.
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DTC of the sensor check function:

Code No. Diagnosis Trouble Area
SRight front speed sensor
C1271/71 Low output voltage of right front speed sensor SSensor installation
SSensor rotor
SLeft front speed sensor
C1272/72 Low output voltage of left front speed sensor SSensor installation
SSensor rotor
SRight rear speed sensor
C1273/73 Low output voltage of right rear speed sensor SSensor installation
SSensor rotor
SLeft rear speed sensor
C1274 /74 Low output voltage of left rear speed sensor SSensor installation
SSensor rotor
Abnormal change in output voltage of right front speed )
C1275/75 SRight front speed sensor rotor
sensor
Abnormal change in output voltage of left front speed
C1276 /76 SLeft front speed sensor rotor
sensor
Abnormal change in output voltage of right rear speed )
C1277 177 SRight rear speed sensor rotor
sensor
Abnormal change in output voltage of left rear speed
C1278/78 SLeft rear speed sensor rotor
sensor
) . SDeceleration sensor
C1279/79 Deceleration sensor is faulty . .
SSensor installation
C1282/ 82 Center differential lock position switch malfunction S Center differential lock position switch
C1282 /83 L4 position switch malfunction SL4 position switch

3. DECELERATION SENSOR OPERATION DIAGNOSIS

SYSTEM

CAUTION:

While checking the deceleration sensor operating diagno-
sis system, ABS does not work and brake system works as
a conventional brake system.

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)
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SUPPLY SYSTEM
4. DECELERATION SENSOR CHECK
(@) Connect 3 dry batteries of 1.5 V in series.
(b) Connect VGS terminal to the batteries’ positive (+) termi-
L1 nal, and GGND terminal to the batteries’ negative (-) ter-
= minal, apply about 4.5 V between VGS and GGND termi-
nals.
NOTICE:
GGND | Do not apply voltage of 6 V or more to terminals VGS and
GGND.
(c) Check the output voltage of GL1 terminals.
" Symbols Condition Standard Value
% GL1 Horizontal About 2.3V
Rearward GL1 Lean forward 0.4V -about 2.3V
Forward i
GL1 Lean rearward About2.3V -4.1V
HINT:
S Ifthe sensor is tilted too much it may show the wrong val-
ue.
e If dropped, the sensor should be replaced with a new one.
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The sensor removed from the vehicle should not be
placed upside down.



